Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2340
Choice of law as to meaning and effect of wills.

The meaning and legal effect of a disposition in a will shall be determined by the local law of a particular state selected by the testator in his instrument unless the application of that law is contrary to the provisions relating to the elective share described in part 2 of this article, the provisions relating to exempt property and allowances described in part 4 of this article, or any other public policy of this state otherwise applicable to the disposition.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 62, UPC § 2-602.